Louisiana, session 2026, HB617.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 51:1429.1 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1429.1. Unfair trade practice or act; mandatory fees or surcharges; disclosure
required
A. For the purposes of this Section, the following terms have the following
meanings ascribed to them in this Subsection:
(1) "Good" means any immovable or movable thing, whether corporeal or
incorporeal, which may be the object of a contract of sale or lease in accordance with
Chapter 3 of Title VII of Book III of the Civil Code.
(2) "Price-variable supplier" means a supplier offering a good or service the
total price of which is determined by a consumer's selection or preference or
dependent on distance or time, including but not limited to an online platform
providing food delivery or ride share.
(3) "Supplier" means a seller, lessor, licensor, or professional advertising,
soliciting, or engaging in consumer transactions, or a manufacturer, distributor, or
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-781 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 617
licensor advertising, selling, leasing, or licensing a good or service to be sold, leased,
or licensed by other persons in consumer transactions.
B. A supplier shall not advertise or display a price for a good or service in
connection with a consumer transaction without clearly and conspicuously
displaying the total price, including any mandatory fee or surcharge. A supplier that
provides both a good and a service to a consumer may comply with this Section by
displaying or advertising the total price of the good separately from the total price
or rate charged for the service.
C. A supplier offering a good or service in an auction complies with this
Section if that supplier clearly and conspicuously discloses any mandatory fee
associated with the transaction and a disclaimer that the total cost of the good or
service may vary.
D. A restaurant or hotel complies with this Section if it includes a clear and
conspicuous disclosure of the percentage or amount of any automatic or mandatory
gratuity or service fee charged in each offer or advertisement that includes pricing
information for a good or service.
E. A price-variable supplier complies with this Section if that supplier
clearly and conspicuously discloses all of the following:
(1) The factors determining the final price.
(2) Any mandatory fee or surcharge associated with the transaction.
(3) A statement that the total cost of services may vary.
F. A provider of broadband internet access service on its own or as part of
a bundle that complies with federal broadband consumer transparency requirements
pursuant to 47 CFR Part 8, Subpart A, and a provider of telecommunications services
that complies with 47 CFR 64.2401, is compliant with this Section.
G. A cable operator that complies with pricing requirements pursuant to 47
U.S.C. 552 is compliant with this Section.
H. A direct broadcast satellite provider that complies with pricing
requirements pursuant to 47 CFR Part 76, Subpart H is compliant with this Section.
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-781 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 617
I. A provider of live-event tickets that complies with the provisions of 16
CFR Part 464 relating to live-event tickets is compliant with this Section.
J. A provider of real estate, or of real estate transaction or settlement
services, including a lessor, property owner, property manager, real estate licensee,
broker, agent, title agent, or title insurer, is exempt from this Section.
K. A licensee pursuant to R.S. 32:1251 et seq. who complies with the
advertising regulations promulgated by the Louisiana Motor Vehicle Commission
is compliant with this Section.